Washington statutes.
RCW 26.23.055

Support proceedings, orders, and registry—Required information—Duty to update—Service.

(1) Each party to a paternity or child support proceeding must provide the court and the Washington state child support registry with the confidential information form as required under RCW 26.23.050.

(2) Each party to an order entered in a child support or paternity proceeding shall update the information required under subsection (1) of this section promptly after any change in the information. The duty established under this section continues as long as any monthly support or support debt remains due under the support order.

(3) In any proceeding to establish, enforce, or modify the child support order between the parties, a party may demonstrate to the presiding officer that he or she has diligently attempted to locate the other party. Upon a showing of diligent efforts to locate, the presiding officer shall deem service of process for the action by delivery of written notice to the address most recently provided by the party under this section to be adequate notice of the action.

(4) All support orders shall contain notice to the parties of the obligations established by this section and possibility of service of process according to subsection (3) of this section.

[ 2001 c 42 s 4; 1998 c 160 s 3; 1997 c 58 s 904.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—2001 c 42: See notes following RCW 26.09.020.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.